Utah statutes.
26-15-7.   Rules for controlling vector-borne diseases and pests.

The department shall adopt rules to provide for the protection of the public health by controlling or preventing the spread of vector-borne diseases and infections and to control or reduce pests by the elimination of insanitary conditions which may include but not be limited to breeding areas, shelter, harborage or sources of food associated with such diseases or pests.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

